Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
General Provisions

§ 69-1-1.
Department of Agriculture and Commerce created.

A Department of Agriculture and Commerce is created and established under the management and control of a public officer to be known as the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, who shall have competent knowledge of agriculture, mining, manufacturing, statistics and general industries, must be an experienced and practical agriculturist; must be a resident of the state for five (5) years immediately preceding the day of election; and shall be elected by the people at the time and in the manner that other state officers are elected.

The residency requirements specified under this section shall apply to elections held from and after January 1, 2020.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1622; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3403; 1930, § 3599; 1942, § 4415; Laws, 1958, ch. 148, § 1; Laws, 2019, ch. 433, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 69-1-3.
Term of office of commissioner.

The term of office of the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce shall be four years, and any vacancy occurring shall be filled by appointment by the Governor as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1623; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3404; 1930, § 3600; 1942, § 4416.

§ 69-1-5.
Oath and bond of commissioner.

The commissioner, before entering upon the duties of the office, must take and subscribe the oath of office prescribed by the constitution, and must enter into bond payable to the State of Mississippi, in the sum of five thousand dollars with a guaranty company, the expense of such bond being paid by the state. The bond must be approved by the Attorney General and when approved shall, together with the oath of office, be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1625; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3406; 1930, § 3601; 1942, § 4417.

§ 69-1-7.
Place of office.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce must keep his office in the city of Jackson.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1627; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3408; 1930, § 3602; 1942, § 4418.

§ 69-1-9.
Appointment of clerk; oath and term of office.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce must appoint a clerk, who must take the oath of office to discharge faithfully all the duties, which are or may be required of him by law. The clerk shall hold office during the term of the commissioner by whom he is appointed, and until the appointment and qualification of his successor, unless sooner removed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1628; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3409; 1930, § 3603; 1942, § 4419.

§ 69-1-11.
Duties and salary of clerk.

The clerk must discharge such duties as may be prescribed by the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce. The expense necessarily incurred by the clerk in traveling on business of the department, under direction of the commissioner, must be paid for and charged against the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1629; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3410; 1930, § 3604; 1942, § 4420.

§ 69-1-13.
Duties of commissioner.

The following are the duties of the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce:

He shall encourage the proper development of agriculture, horticulture and kindred industries.

He shall encourage the organization of neighborhood and county agricultural clubs and associations, and out of these the organization of the state agricultural association.

He shall collect and publish statistics and such other information regarding such industries of this state and of other states as may be of benefit in developing the agricultural resources of the state. To this end he shall put himself in connection and shall cooperate with the agricultural department of other states and with the Commissioner of Agriculture of the United States, and shall provide for the proper and careful distribution of all documents and information coming into his possession on account of the department that may be of interest and benefit to the people of the state.

He shall cause to be investigated the diseases of grain, cotton, fruit and other crops grown in this state and also remedies for such diseases, and also the habits and propagation of the various insects that are injurious to the crops of the state and the proper mode of their destruction.

He shall investigate the subject of grasses and report upon their value and the cultivation of the varieties best adapted to the different sections of the state.

He shall inquire into the subjects connected with dairying that he may deem of interest to the people of the state, and in this connection the raising of stock and poultry, the obtaining of such as are of most value, and the breeding and propagation of the same; and shall encourage raising of fish and the culture of bees.

He shall investigate the subjects of subsoiling, drainage, etc., and the best modes of effecting each, and of irrigation and what portions of the state can be best benefited thereby.

He shall investigate and report upon the culture of wool and the utility and profit of sheep-raising, also the culture of silk and its manufacture and preparation for market.

He shall investigate and report on the question of broadening the market for cotton and cotton goods in the United States and foreign countries.

He shall cause a proper collection of agricultural statistics to be made annually, and to this end shall furnish blank forms to the tax assessors of each county, and it is made the special duty of the tax assessor to whom said blanks are furnished to report to the bureau a list of all public or private ginners in his county, with their post offices, upon the demand of the commissioner. It shall be the duty of the commissioner to furnish to such ginner a form or forms of report to be made to the bureau at such time as the commissioner may direct. A failure to make such reports on the part of the ginner or assessor as required by said commissioner shall be deemed a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, punished as provided by law. It shall be the duty of the members of the boards of supervisors and the county tax assessor of each county in this state to make such reports as may be required by this bureau touching the matter within the scope of this chapter; and failure of any supervisor or tax assessor to make such report when required shall be deemed a misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided by law.

He shall appoint county correspondents who shall report to him from time to time, as may be desired.

He shall collect specimens of wood suitable for manufacture and other purposes, and specimens of agricultural, mineral, phosphate and marl deposits of the state; cause correct analysis of such as may be deemed expedient to be made and recorded in a substantial book to be kept for this purpose.

He shall also, as soon as practicable, prepare a convenient handbook with necessary illustrated maps, which shall contain all necessary information as to the mines, mineral, forest, soil, and other products, climate, water, waterpower for the establishing of factories, land, flowers, fisheries, mountains, streams, and all other statistics as are best adapted to the giving of proper information and the attraction of advantages which the state affords to immigrants, and shall make illustrated expositions thereof whenever practicable at international and state expositions.

He shall have the primary responsibility for developing programs that will enhance the marketing of the state’s agricultural products to both national and international markets.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1630; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3411; 1930, § 3605; 1942, § 4421; Laws, 1987, ch. 482, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1987).

§ 69-1-14.
Employment of counsel by commissioner; compensation and expenses.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce is hereby authorized and empowered to employ an attorney to represent the department of agriculture and commerce and to fix his compensation subject to the approval of the state personnel board. Said attorney shall be a full-time employee of the department of agriculture and commerce and shall be furnished such office space and clerical assistance as shall be necessary. In addition to his duties with the department of agriculture and commerce, said attorney shall represent the board of animal health, the Mississippi State Fair Commission and the Mississippi Central Market Board. The salary and expenses of said attorney shall be paid from any funds available to the department of agriculture and commerce, the board of animal health, the Mississippi Fair Commission and the Mississippi Central Market Board in a ratio commensurate with the services provided by said attorney to each of the said agencies.

The Department of Agriculture and Commerce, the board of animal health, the Mississippi Fair Commission and the Mississippi Central Market Board are hereby authorized and empowered to expend such sums from any funds available for the purposes of paying the salary and expenses of the attorney provided for in subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 365, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 69-1-15.
Commissioner to make report.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce shall make and submit to the Governor on or before the 10th day of January each year a report showing all the expenditures of the bureau for the preceding year and shall make a full and comprehensive report of the scope of the work and expenditures of the bureau to each session of the Legislature within ten days of the convening thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1631; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3412; 1930, § 3606; 1942, § 4422.

§ 69-1-17.
State institutions to aid in furnishing data; free transportation.

In order to facilitate the collection and collation of the accurate information of the resources of the state along all lines, the heads of the several departments of the state government and of the state institutions are hereby required to furnish accurately such information as may be at their command to the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce when called upon for same; and the commissioner is hereby empowered to enter manufacturing establishments chartered by the state, in prosecution of this work, and the corporations operating the same shall furnish such information as may not be injurious to their business, when requested to furnish same by the commissioner. The commissioner and his clerks shall have the right to accept and use free transportation over steamships, steamboat and railway lines.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1632; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3413; 1930, § 3607; 1942, § 4423.

§ 69-1-18.
Definitions; authority of commissioner to promulgate rules and regulations and to conduct sanitation inspections in retail food stores; licensing; penalties.

The following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Potentially hazardous food” means a food that is natural or synthetic and that requires temperature control because it is in a form capable of supporting: the growth of infectious or toxigenic microorganisms; the growth and toxin production of Clostridium botulinum; or in raw shell eggs, the growth of salmonella enteritis. “Potentially hazardous food” includes an animal food (of animal origin) that is raw or heat-treated; a food of plant origin that is heat-treated or consists of raw seed sprouts; and cut melons.

“Micro market” means an unattended, self-checkout retail establishment that utilizes an automated payment system; is located in the interior of a building that is generally not accessible by the general public, with limited access and use to a defined population; and

Offers for sale only commercially, tamper-evident packaged food and beverages properly labeled for individual retail sale and acquired from a source approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration or an appropriate state government agency; whole, uncut, raw fruits and vegetables; such other food and beverages as may be authorized in the Food Code, as adopted by the Department of Agriculture and Commerce; and any other food and beverages not otherwise subject to any required on-site inspection;

Has no on-site food preparation except for the heating or reheating of food in a microwave oven;

May utilize beverage dispensers which provide individual servings; and

May utilize refrigeration and freezer units.

“Vending Machine” means a self-service machine that, upon insertion of a coin, paper currency, token, card, or key, or by optional manual operation, dispenses servings of food in bulk or in packages, or prepared by the machine, without the necessity of replenishing the machine between each vending operation.

“Retail food establishment” means any establishment where food and food products are offered for sale to the ultimate consumer and intended for off-premise consumption. Such food or food products may be exposed to varying degrees of preparation and may often need further preparation or processing after it has been purchased. A retail food establishment does not include:

An establishment that offers only prepackaged foods that are not potentially hazardous;

A produce stand that only offers whole, uncut fresh fruits and vegetables;

A food processing plant;

A food establishment as defined by the Mississippi State Department of Health;

A micro market; and

A vending machine.

The commissioner and his agents shall have the authority:

To promulgate rules and regulations establishing certain sanitation requirements for retail food establishments;

To conduct sanitation inspections in retail food establishments; and

To publish the names and addresses of violators and such information pertaining to violation(s) of this section as he deems appropriate.

Each retail food establishment, before engaging in business, shall obtain a license from the commissioner. Owners of more than one (1) retail food establishment must obtain a license for each establishment. A license fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) must be paid to the department before a license will be issued. Application for such license shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the commissioner. Licenses issued under this subsection by the commissioner shall expire on June 30 each year and application for renewals thereof shall be made annually before the expiration date. Licenses shall not be transferable and application must be made for a new license if there is any change in location or ownership of the business.

Any person who violates any provision of this law or the regulations adopted hereunder shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by the imposition of a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed six (6) months, or both.

The commissioner may impose administrative penalties for violation of this section.

Any person found by the commissioner to be in violation of this section may be assessed a penalty in an amount of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and subsequent violations within a six-month period at a penalty of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). In addition to, or in lieu of, such penalties the commissioner may suspend or revoke the permit issued to such person under terms of this section.

When any violation of this section or the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder occurs, or is about to occur, that presents a clear and present danger to the public health, safety or welfare requiring immediate action, the commissioner or any of the department’s field inspectors, or any other persons authorized by the commissioner, may issue an order to be effective immediately before notice and a hearing, that imposes any or all of the following penalties against the accused: (a) a stop sale order on any product in violation of this section; (b) an order to seize any product that is not in compliance with this section and require it to be denatured or destroyed under the supervision of the department’s inspectors; or (c) an order that the retail food establishment or any department within such establishment cease operations until it is in compliance with this section. The order shall be served upon the accused in accordance with Rule 4 of the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure or certified mail or it may be served by giving a copy of the order to the manager of the retail food establishment or, where no manager is present, an employee of the establishment. The accused shall then have twenty (20) days after service of the order upon him within which to request an informal administrative review before the Director of the Bureau of Regulatory Services in the department, or the director’s designee, who shall act as reviewing officer. If the accused makes such a request within such time, the reviewing officer shall provide an informal administrative review to the accused within ten (10) days after such request is made. If the accused does not request an informal administrative review within twenty (20) days, then he shall have waived his right to such review. At the informal administrative review, there shall be no court reporter or record made of the proceedings. Each party may present its case in the form of documents, oral statements or any other method. The rules of evidence shall not apply. The reviewing officer’s decisions shall be in writing, and it shall be delivered by certified mail. If the accused is aggrieved by the order of the hearing officer, he may appeal to the commissioner for a full evidentiary hearing. Such appeal shall be perfected by filing a notice of appeal with the commissioner within thirty (30) days after the order of the reviewing officer is served on the appealing party. The hearing before the commissioner or his designee shall be held within a reasonable time after the appeal has been perfected. Failure to perfect an appeal within the allotted time shall be deemed a waiver of such right.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 348, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 514, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000; Laws, 2019, ch. 338, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 69-1-19.
Commissioner to establish grades and standards of farm products.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce is hereby authorized to establish grades and standards from time to time for farm products grown or produced in this state, provided that any grade or standard on any farm product which may be established by the United States Department of Agriculture under authority of congress shall also be established by the commissioner of agriculture and commerce as the standard for this state.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce may also establish standard sizes for boxes, or containers, used in the handling of fruits and vegetables in this state, provided such standards established by the commissioner shall conform with the federal standard container act of congress. The commissioner may also establish the standard weight of each box or container when filled with fruits or vegetables.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3608; 1942, § 4424; Laws, 1924, ch. 274; Laws, 1948, ch. 191, § 1.

§ 69-1-21.
Certifying grade and condition of farm products.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce is hereby authorized to investigate and certify to shippers and other financially interested parties, the grade, quality or condition of farm products in accordance with the standard established by him. The certificates issued by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall be received in all counties of this state as prima facie evidence of the truth of statements contained therein. For this service the commissioner may charge reasonable fees designed to cover the cost of these services.

All fees collected under the provisions of this section shall be deposited in the general fund of the state treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3609; 1942, § 4425; Laws, 1924, ch. 274; Laws, 1970, ch. 255, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1970.

§ 69-1-23.
Inspection of grain crops; definitions; licensing of inspectors; grading samples.

The Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce is hereby designated as the official inspection agency within the State of Mississippi, or for a company domiciled in the State of Mississippi, to certify to producers, shippers, and other financially interested parties the grade, quality, or condition of grain crops. Grain crops for the purpose of this chapter shall be those crops for which standards have been established under the United States Grain Standards Act; namely, wheat, oats, corn, barley, rye, flaxseed, soybeans, grain sorghum, and mixed grains and other crops for which standards may hereafter be established.

The Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall have the sole authority to recommend to the U. S. Department of Agriculture the licensing of inspectors for the purpose of carrying out the inspection, grading and certification of grain inspection under the United States Department of Agriculture Grain Standards Act, except that those persons already licensed as of this date under any other authority may continue to operate in their respective designated areas.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce shall adopt rules and regulations to provide that any grain producer, submitting grain for sale at any elevator in the state, shall be entitled to have that grain graded by an official inspector. The grain producer shall be responsible for and shall pay the cost of grading such sample.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4425.3; Laws, 1964, ch. 213; Laws, 1989, ch. 348 § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 398, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1997).

§ 69-1-25.
Commissioner, Governor and Attorney General to enforce regulations as to products coming in.

The State Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, the Governor and the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi, are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to protect the welfare of the people of the State of Mississippi by guaranteeing that seeds, feeds, fertilizers, bulbs, vegetables, or any and all other product of farm, grove, forest, garden and minerals, including but not limited to coal and lime, coming into the State of Mississippi meet the proper standards, in accordance with the laws of the State of Mississippi and rules and regulations drawn by the State Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, with the approval of the Attorney General, governing the labeling as to net weight, source of origin, purity, and grade thereof. In the case of coal or lime, the State Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, with the approval of the Attorney General, may promulgate rules and regulations setting up a form or forms to be used in guaranteeing the net weight at the point of delivery, to be weighed on approved scales in the presence of the purchaser.

Any person, firm or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or both, and each sale of any such goods or products without meeting the requirements of this section shall constitute a separate offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4425.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 132, §§ 1, 2.

§ 69-1-27.
Commissioner to co-operate with U. S. Department.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce is hereby authorized to co-operate with the secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture or any of his authorized agents or representatives in carrying out the purpose of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 3610; 1942, § 4426; Laws, 1924, ch. 274.

§ 69-1-28.
State regulations governing free-range poultry shall be no more stringent than federal regulations on free-range chickens.

Any regulations or best management practices adopted by the Commissioner of Agriculture regulating free-range poultry only shall be no more stringent or extensive in scope, coverage, or effect than federal regulations and best management practices. For purposes of this section, “free-range poultry” means poultry having free access to the outdoors through their normal growing cycle.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 462, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 69-1-29.
Inspection of seed and fertilizer furnished by the federal government.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce of the State of Mississippi, is authorized and empowered to enter into an agreement and execute any contract pursuant thereto, with the secretary of agriculture of the United States for the purpose of, and providing for, inspection, by the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce of the State of Mississippi, of superphosphate, liming materials and seed furnished to producers by the department of agriculture of the United States as grants-in-aid to producers under its soil conservation program.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4427; Laws, 1942, ch. 258.

§ 69-1-30.
Security guards for Jim Buck Ross Mississippi Agriculture and Forestry Museum.

The Department of Agriculture and Commerce is hereby authorized to employ or to contract with private security agencies to provide security for the Jim Buck Ross Mississippi Agriculture and Forestry Museum. The jurisdiction of the security guards shall be limited to the museum property and shall not supplant the authority or jurisdiction of any state or local law enforcement officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 461; Laws, 1991, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 69-1-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1989, ch. 544, § 161, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

[Codes, 1906, § 1622; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3403; 1930, § 3599; 1942, § 4415; Laws, 1958, ch. 148, § 1]

§ 69-1-32.
“Jim Buck Ross Mississippi Agriculture and Forestry Museum” designated.

The Mississippi Agriculture and Forestry Museum shall be renamed and known as the Jim Buck Ross Mississippi Agriculture and Forestry Museum. The Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall have an appropriate sign or signs placed at the museum displaying the new name of the museum.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 516, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§§ 69-1-33 through 69-1-39.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1989, ch. 544, § 161, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§69-1-33. [Codes, 1942, § 4428; Laws, 1942, ch. 255; Laws, 1944, ch. 243, § 1; Laws, 1948, ch. 192, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 148, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 322, § 1]

§69-1-35. [Codes, 1942, § 4430; Laws, 1942, ch. 255; Laws, 1958, ch. 148, § 3; Laws, 1971, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 364; Laws, 1980, ch. 319]

§69-1-37. [Codes, 1942, § 4431; Laws, 1942, ch. 255, § 4; Laws, 1944, ch. 243, § 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 148, § 4]

§69-1-39. [Codes, 1942, § 4433; Laws, 1942, ch. 255; Laws, 1958, ch. 148, § 5]

§ 69-1-40.
Warehouses for storage of lime.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce is hereby authorized at his discretion, and when the funds are available to construct or lease, operate and maintain warehouses to be utilized as a storage place for lime to be used for agricultural purposes. Said warehouses shall be located in the area of the state commonly referred to as the “Mississippi Delta.” The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce is further authorized and directed to operate said lime warehouses in such a way as to provide adequate amounts of lime needed for agricultural purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 383, eff from and after passage (approved March 21, 1975).

§§ 69-1-41 and 69-1-43.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1989, ch. 544, § 161, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§69-1-41. [Codes, 1942, § 4434; Laws, 1942, ch. 255, § 7; Laws, 1944, ch. 243, § 3; Laws, 1948, ch. 360, § 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 148, § 6; Laws, 1966, ch. 222, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 256, § 1]

§69-1-43. [Codes, 1906, § 1630; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3411; 1930, § 3605; 1942, §§ 4421, 4435; Laws, 1942, ch. 255; Laws, 1958, ch. 148, § 7]

§ 69-1-45.
Construction and purpose of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed in any way to conflict with the work and scope of the Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science and the Mississippi Experiment Station. It is the purpose of this chapter to secure the co-operation by the Department of Agriculture and Commerce with the said university and experiment station in the dissemination and publicity of such useful information as may come into the possession of said departments.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1630; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3411; 1930, § 3605; 1942, § 4421.

§ 69-1-47.
Funding for repairs and renovations at farmers’ market.

The Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce is hereby authorized and empowered, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance and Administration to borrow, from time to time, an amount not to exceed One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) in the aggregate for repairs and renovations at the Farmers’ Market in Jackson, Hinds County, Mississippi.

The rental proceeds received by the Central Market Board shall be pledged for the payment of the principal of and interest on such loan, which shall not exceed a term of ten (10) years and shall bear an interest rate not to exceed that provided in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 418; Laws, 1992, ch. 452, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1992).

§ 69-1-48.
Authorization to accept, budget, receive and expend funds for improvements to department property and for marketing and promotion programs; funding improvements to Mississippi Agriculture and Forestry Museum.

For purposes of this section, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein:

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce.

“Museum” means the Mississippi Agriculture and Forestry Museum.

The department may accept, budget, receive and expend funds from any source for improvements to department property and for marketing and promotion programs.

The department may allow a federal, state, or local governmental entity or a public, private, commercial or charitable entity to use, publish or advertise the entity’s name on department property and in its publications. Furthermore, the commissioner may lease to any public, private, commercial or charitable entity for a term not to exceed twenty (20) years naming rights for museum buildings or property, including, but not limited to, new construction, improvements to existing buildings, grounds and/or objects located on museum property in return for consideration benefitting the department. The lessee shall pay the cost of erecting, maintaining and removing signage related to the property.

Any funds received from the advertising or lease of naming rights shall be retained by the department and expended for improvements to its property, and marketing and promotion programs.

The department may accept, budget, receive and expend these funds in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in the manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds.

There is established in the State Treasury a special fund for the department for the monies collected under this section.

Unexpended monies remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into the fund.

The department shall make reasonable attempts to notify the donor of any donated property or artifacts determined to be obsolete to allow such donor to retake possession of such item. If efforts to notify the donor prove unsuccessful, then the department may dispose of, auction or sell any property or artifact in the possession of the museum if the department determines that it is obsolete, no longer of value or use to the museum or unclaimed by the donor.

All funds received under this section on behalf of the museum, shall be transferred into the nonbudgeted enterprise fund related to the museum. The enterprise funds shall be maintained in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and regulations prescribed by the Department of Finance and Administration.

The department may expend these funds for improvements to the museum and for marketing and promotion programs for the museum in a manner consistent with the museum’s historical purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 505, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 364, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2017).

§ 69-1-49.
Studies concerning commodity exchange entity, Farm Assistance in Rural Mississippi (FARM) Program, and marketing outlets; federal assistance; reports.

The Department of Agriculture and Commerce and the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service shall study the merits of establishing a commodity exchange entity whose purpose shall be to coordinate and enhance the marketing of Mississippi crops, poultry and livestock in national and international markets. Such entity would have the authority to consign and broker such crops, poultry and livestock. A report of the study shall be submitted on or before August 1, 1987, to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and the Legislature.

The Department of Agriculture and Commerce and the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service shall evaluate the merits of creating a Farm Assistance in Rural Mississippi (FARM) Program, which shall have as its primary features a price enhancement program and a debt reduction assistance program for crop producers. A report on this program shall be submitted on or before September 1, 1987, to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and the Legislature.

The Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall request the Agri-Marketing Service, marketing affiliate branch of the United States Department of Agriculture to conduct a feasibility study on marketing outlets. The Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall provide the assistance necessary to accomplish the purpose of this section. A report on this study shall be submitted on or before January 1, 1988, to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 482, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1987).

§ 69-1-51.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms by Laws, 1995, ch. 493, § 1, eff on July 1, 1997.

[Laws, 1995, ch. 493, § 1]

§ 69-1-53.
Studies concerning the market feasibility of the sale of hybrid bream and hybrid black stripe crappie.

The Division of Agriculture, Forestry and Veterinary Medicine at Mississippi State University shall in cooperation with the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce and the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks: (a) study the development of a test that can be used in the field for identifying differences between wild species of game fish and game fish produced in an aquacultural facility; and (b) research the culture feasibility and market potential of the sale of hybrid bream and hybrid black stripe crappie as authorized in Section 79-22-9.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 370, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1997).

§ 69-1-55.
Prohibition against misrepresentation of country of origin of shrimp and crawfish by restaurant that sells imported crawfish or shrimp; penalties for violation.

No owner or manager of a restaurant that sells imported crawfish or shrimp shall misrepresent to the public, either verbally, on a menu, or on a sign displayed on the premises, that the imported crawfish or shrimp is domestic.

A restaurant may designate a shrimp or crawfish as having a United States country of origin if:

The farm-raised shrimp or crawfish is hatched, raised, harvested and processed in the United States; or

The wild shrimp or crawfish is harvested in the waters of the United States, a state or a territory of the United States and processed in the United States, a state or a territory of the United States.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce and the Attorney General shall regulate restaurants under this section.

The commissioner shall notify, in writing, any restaurant violating this section and shall give the owner or manager three (3) days to correct the violation.No penalties under this section shall apply to any owner or manager that corrects the violation within three (3) days from the date notified by the commissioner.

In addition to any other civil or criminal penalties, any person who violates this section or who otherwise misrepresents imported crawfish or shrimp as domestic may be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).For a second offense, a person may be punished by a fine of not more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00). For any subsequent violations, a person may be punished by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or by having the license for the restaurant suspended indefinitely or until the restaurant has corrected the violation, or both. Any person against whom a complaint is made or who has been made subject to a fine or license suspension as provided by this subsection may avail themselves of a due process administrative hearing as provided by Section 69-7-616.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 476, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.